Utah statutes.
53A-19-104.   Limits on appropriations -- Estimated expendable revenue.

(1)  A local school board may not make any appropriation in excess of its estimated expendable revenue, including undistributed reserves, for the following fiscal year.

(2)  In determining the estimated expendable revenue, any existing deficits arising through excessive expenditures from former years are deducted from the estimated revenue for the ensuing year to the extent of at least 10% of the entire tax revenue of the district for the previous year.

(3)  In the event of financial hardships, the board may deduct from the estimated expendable revenue for the ensuing year, by fund, at least 25% of the deficit amount.

(4)  All estimated balances available for appropriations at the end of the fiscal year shall revert to the funds from which they were appropriated and shall be fund balances available for appropriation in the budget of the following year.

(5)  A local school board may reduce a budget appropriation at its regular meeting if notice of the proposed action is given to all board members and the district superintendent at least one week prior to the meeting.

(6)  An increase in an appropriation may not be made by the board unless the following steps are taken:

(a)  the board receives a written request from the district superintendent that sets forth the reasons for the proposed increase;

(b)  notice of the request is published:

(i)  in a newspaper of general circulation within the school district at least one week prior to the board meeting at which the request will be considered; and

(ii)  in accordance with Section 45-1-101, at least one week prior to the board meeting at which the request will be considered; and

(c)  the board holds a public hearing on the request prior to the board's acting on the request.



Amended by Chapter 388, 2009 General Session

